Mississippi statutes. Title 65. Highways, Bridges and Ferries
Toll Evasion

§ 65-43-71.
Definitions.

The following words and phrases shall have the meanings ascribed herein unless the context clearly indicates otherwise, as used in Sections 65-43-71 through 65-43-85 and Section 65-43-6:

“Toll facility operator” means any private company contracting with a governmental entity to collect tolls or fees for the use of any toll road or toll bridge as authorized under Section 65-43-3;

“Processing agency” means a governmental entity, or a toll facility operator designated by any governmental entity, responsible for the processing of the notices of toll evasions and notices of delinquent toll evasions and penalties. A processing agency may include a public agency or private vendor with which any governmental entity contracts for the processing of notices of toll evasions and notices of delinquent toll evasions;

“Toll facility” means any road or bridge for which tolls or fees are charged for the use thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 44, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 2008.).

§ 65-43-73.
Use of toll facility without payment of tolls prohibited; notice of toll evasion violation; contents of notice; timing of notice.

A person may not use any toll facility without payment of tolls, except as specifically provided by statute, ordinance, regulation or rule of a governing entity.

If a vehicle is found by automated devices, visual observation, or otherwise to have evaded tolls on any toll facility, the processing agency shall, within thirty (30) days of the violation, forward to the registered owner of the vehicle involved in the violation, by certified mail, return receipt requested, or by personal delivery, a notice of toll evasion violation setting forth the violation, including reference to the statute, ordinance, regulation or rule violated, the approximate time and location of the violation and the amount of the toll owed by the violator. Included with the notice of toll evasion violation shall be an affidavit of nonliability that complies with the requirements of Section 65-43-81. In the case of joint ownership of a motor vehicle, the notice must be mailed to the first name appearing on the registration, unless the first name is a business organization, in which case the second name appearing on the registration may be used. Mailing the notice to the address provided for notice or personal delivery constitutes legal notification to the violator. If accurate information concerning the identity and address of the registered owner of the vehicle is not available to the processing agency within thirty (30) days of the violation, the processing agency shall have an additional forty-five (45) calendar days to obtain such information and forward the notice of toll evasion violation. If after ninety (90) calendar days of the violation the processing agency has not obtained accurate information concerning the identity and address of the registered owner of the vehicle, the processing agency may publish the notice of the toll evasion for two (2) weeks in a newspaper having general circulation in the county of the registered owner’s last known residence. This publication shall constitute legal notification to the violator. The notice of toll evasion violation shall also set forth the following:

The vehicle license plate number;

If practicable, the registration expiration date and the make of the vehicle;

A clear and concise explanation of the procedures for contesting the violation and appealing an adverse decision.

A violation of subsection (1) of this section is an infraction subject to a penalty established pursuant to Section 65-43-75. The collection of civil penalties shall be governed by the civil administrative procedures set forth in Section 65-43-77.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 44, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 2008.).

§ 65-43-75.
Written notice of toll evasion penalty to accompany notice of toll evasion violation; penalties.

The notice of toll evasion violation shall be accompanied by a written notice of the toll evasion penalty due for that violation, the address of the person authorized to receive payment of the toll evasion penalty, an affidavit of nonliability and a statement that payment of the toll evasion penalty for the toll evasion violation may be sent through the mail.

The schedule of toll evasion penalties for toll evasion violations shall be established by the governmental entity having jurisdiction over the toll road, but shall not exceed the amount of the unpaid toll plus One Hundred Dollars ($100.00) per violation.

Toll evasion penalties under this section may be collected as civil penalties.

If the amount of the unpaid toll, along with any applicable toll evasion penalty, is received by the person authorized to receive the deposit of these fees and there is no contest as to that toll evasion violation pursuant to Sections 65-43-71 through 65-43-83, the proceedings shall terminate.

The amount of the unpaid toll, and any applicable penalties, shall be retained by or remitted to the governmental entity having jurisdiction over the toll road.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 44, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 2008.).

§ 65-43-77.
Establishment of system of civil administrative adjudication; administrative fees and charges.

The governmental entity shall establish a system of civil administrative adjudication to adjudicate the contest of any alleged instances of a vehicle’s operation on a toll facility without the required toll having been paid, such system shall include a schedule of administrative fees and charges due in addition to the unpaid toll and/or penalty.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 44, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 2008.).

§ 65-43-79.
Appeal from decision of adjudicative process.

Any person aggrieved by a final decision of the adjudicative process set forth in Section 65-43-77, may appeal such decision within ten (10) days from the date of the postmark appearing on the notice of final decision mailed to the contestant. The appeal shall be initiated by the filing of a written notice of appeal accompanied by a bill of exceptions which shall embody the facts, order and decision of the adjudicative body and which shall be signed by the party executing the final decision appealed from. The contestant shall file the notice of appeal and bill of exceptions in the circuit court of the county in which the alleged violation took place and the court shall hear and determine the same on the case as presented by the bill of exceptions as an appellate court and shall affirm or reverse the final decision. A copy of that notice and bill of exceptions must be provided to all parties or their attorneys of record and the lower authority whose order or judgment is being appealed. A certificate of service must accompany the written notice of appeal. If the decision be reversed, the circuit court shall render such order or judgment and certify same to that body; and the costs shall be awarded as in other cases. The contents of the adjudicative body’s official file in the case, including a copy of the notice of toll evasion violation, shall be made a part of the record on appeal and shall constitute prima facie evidence of the facts stated therein. A copy of the written notice of appeal shall be served by the contestant by certified mail, return receipt requested, upon the adjudicative body by service upon the party executing the final decision.

If no written notice of appeal of the final decision is filed within the period set forth in subsection (1) of this section, the decision shall be deemed final.

If the toll evasion penalty, along with the amount of the unpaid toll, have not been paid and the decision resulting from the judicial review of the final decision is adverse to the contestant, the processing agency may, promptly after the decision becomes final, proceed to collect the penalty.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 44, § 9, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 2008.).

§ 65-43-81.
Final notice of toll evasion; delivery; contents of notice; consequence of failure to pay toll evasion penalty.

If the payment of the amount of the unpaid toll, and any applicable toll evasion penalty, is not received by the person authorized to receive payment of these fees by the time and date fixed for appearance on the notice of toll evasion violation, the processing agency shall deliver to the registered owner a final notice of toll evasion violation.

Delivery of a final notice of toll evasion violation under this section shall be made by certified mail, return receipt requested, addressed to the registered owner, or by personal delivery. If delivery by certified mail or personal delivery is refused by the registered owner, then the processing agency may publish the notice of delinquent toll evasion for two (2) weeks in a newspaper having a general circulation in the county of the registered owner’s last known residence.

The final notice of toll evasion violation shall contain the information specified in Section 65-43-73, and shall also contain a notice to the registered owner that he must either:

Pay the amount of the unpaid toll, and any applicable penalty, or

Provide proof of payment of the unpaid toll, and any applicable penalty or an affidavit of nonliability.

If the registered owner fails to pay the toll evasion penalty, as required, the registered owner shall be deemed responsible for the violation and the amount of the unpaid toll and any administrative fees or charges which shall be due to the governmental entity by the registered owner.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 44, § 10, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 2008.).

§ 65-43-83.
Effect of return of affidavit of nonliability.

If the affidavit of nonliability is returned to the governmental entity within thirty (30) days of the mailing of the notice of toll evasion violation, together with the proof of a written rental agreement or lease between a bona fide renting or leasing company and its customer which identifies the rentee or lessee and provides the driver’s license number, name, and address of the rentee or lessee, the processing agency shall mail, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the rentee or lessee identified in the affidavit of nonliability a final notice of toll evasion violation.

If the affidavit of nonliability is returned with evidence that the registered owner served has made a bona fide sale or transfer of the vehicle and has delivered possession thereof to the purchaser prior to the date of the alleged violation, the processing agency shall cancel the notice of toll evasion violation with respect to that registered owner and the processing agency shall mail, by certified mail, return receipt requested, to the purchaser identified in the affidavit of nonliability a final notice of toll evasion violation. If payment is not received within fifteen (15) days of the mailing of the final notice of toll evasion violation, the processing agency may proceed against the purchaser identified pursuant to Section 65-43-73.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 44, § 11, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 2008.).

§ 65-43-85.
Contracts with collection agencies to collect unpaid toll evasion penalties, fees and charges authorized.

The processing agency may contract with a collection agency to collect unpaid toll evasion penalties, fees and charges.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 44, § 12, eff from and after passage (approved June 2, 2008.).